Missouri, session 2026, SB1022.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 415.405, 415.410, 415.415, and
415.420, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 415.405, 415.410, 415.415,
and 415.420, to read as follows:
415.405. As used in sections 415.400 to 415.425, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Default", the failure to perform on time any
obligation or duty set forth in a rental agreement;
(2) "Electronic mail", an electronic message or an
executable program or computer file that contains an image
of a message that is transmitted between two or more
computers or electronic terminals and includes electronic
messages that are transmitted within or between computer
networks;
(3) "Last known address", that postal address or
electronic mail address provided by the occupant in the
latest rental agreement or the postal or electronic mail
address provided by the occupant in a subsequent written
notice of a change of address, one of which may be
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1022 2
designated in writing by the occupant as the preferred
method of contact which shall be used by the operator;
(4) "Leased space", the individual storage space at
the self-service facility which is rented to an occupant
pursuant to a rental agreement;
(5) "No commercial value", includes but not limited to
any property offered for sale in a commercially reasonable
manner that receives no bid or offer;
(6) "Occupant", a person, lessee, sublessee, successor
or assignee entitled to the use of a leased space at a self-
service storage facility under a rental agreement;
(7) "Operator", the owner, operator, lessor or
sublessor of a self-service storage facility, or an agent or
any other person authorized to manage the facility; except
that, the term "operator" does not include a warehouseman,
unless the operator issues a warehouse receipt, bill of
lading, or other document of title for the personal property
stored;
(8) "Personal property", movable property which is not
affixed to land, including, but not limited to, goods,
wares, merchandise, motor vehicles, watercraft, household
items, and furnishings;
(9) "Private sale", a sale negotiated and concluded
directly between the buyer and seller;
(10) "Public sale", [a sale made after public notice
and includes but is not limited to] a sale at the self-
service storage facility or a sale conducted online at a
publicly accessible website;
(11) "Rental agreement", any written contract or
agreement that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions
or rules concerning the use and occupancy of a self-service
storage facility, which is signed by the occupant and the

SB 1022 3
operator. A rental agreement may be delivered and executed
electronically. If the occupant does not sign a written
rental agreement that the operator has delivered to the
occupant, the occupant's continued use of the leased space
for thirty days shall constitute an acceptance of the rental
agreement with the same effect as if it had been signed by
the occupant;
(12) "Self-service storage facility", any real
property used for renting or leasing individual storage
spaces in which the occupants themselves customarily store
and remove their own personal property on a self-service
basis;
(13) "Verified mail", any method of mailing that is
offered by the United States Postal Service or private
delivery service that provides evidence of mailing.
415.410. 1. An operator may not knowingly permit a
leased space at a self-service storage facility to be used
for residential purposes. An occupant may not use a leased
space for residential purposes.
2. An operator may enter the leased space at all times
which are reasonably necessary to insure the protection and
preservation of the self-service storage facility or any
personal property stored therein.
3. Prior to placing any personal property into his or
her leased space, each occupant shall deliver a written
statement to the operator or indicate in the rental
agreement of such leased space containing the name and
address of each person having a valid lien against such
personal property and the name and address of any third-
party owner of personal property stored or to be stored in
the leased space along with a description of such personal
property.

SB 1022 4
4. The lessee shall be informed in writing that the
lessor either does or does not have casualty insurance on
the lessee's property.
5. If the rental agreement contains a limit on the
value of property stored in occupant's space, such limit
shall be deemed to be the maximum value of the stored
property and the maximum liability of the [owner] operator
for any claim for loss of or damage to stored property.
6. An occupant may not use a self-service storage
facility after the operator has delivered written notice in
person, by verified mail, or by electronic mail of the
termination or nonrenewal of the occupant's rental
agreement. The notice shall provide the occupant with not
less than fourteen days after delivery of the notice to
remove all personal property from the self-service storage
facility.
7. Prior to the occupant's removal of all personal
property, the operator may place reasonable restrictions on
the occupant's use of the self-service storage facility,
including denying access to the self-service storage
facility except for the occupant to remove personal property
during the operator's normal business hours.
8. The operator may dispose of any personal property
remaining at the self-service storage facility after the
date provided in the written notice under subsection 6 of
this section.
415.415. 1. The operator of a self-service storage
facility has a lien on all personal property stored within
each leased space for rent, labor, or other charges, and for
expenses reasonably incurred in sale of such personal
property, as provided in sections 415.400 to 415.425. The
lien established by this subsection shall have priority over

SB 1022 5
all other liens except those liens that have been perfected
and recorded on personal property. The rental agreement
shall contain a statement, in bold type, advising the
occupant of the existence of such lien and that property
stored in the leased space may be sold to satisfy such lien
if the occupant is in default, and that any proceeds from
the sale of the property which remain after satisfaction of
the lien will be paid to the state treasurer if unclaimed by
the occupant within one year after the sale of the property.
2. If the occupant is in default for a period of more
than forty-five days, the operator may enforce the lien
granted in subsection 1 of this section and sell the
property stored in the leased space for cash. Sale of the
property stored on the premises may be done at a public or
private sale, may be done as a unit or in parcels, or may be
by way of one or more contracts, and may be at any time or
place and on any terms as long as the sale is done in a
commercially reasonable manner in accordance with the
provisions of section 400.9-627. The operator may otherwise
dispose of any property which has no commercial value.
3. The proceeds of any sale made under this subsection
shall be applied to satisfy the lien, with any surplus being
held for delivery on demand to the occupant or any other
lienholders which the operator knows of or which are
contained in the statement filed by the occupant pursuant to
subsection 3 of section 415.410 for a period of one year
after receipt of proceeds of the sale and satisfaction of
the lien. No proceeds shall be paid to an occupant until
such occupant files a sworn affidavit with the operator
stating that there are no other valid liens outstanding
against the property sold and that he or she, the occupant,
shall indemnify the operator for any damages incurred or

SB 1022 6
moneys paid by the operator due to claims arising from other
lienholders of the property sold. After the one-year period
set in this subsection, any proceeds remaining after
satisfaction of the lien shall be considered abandoned
property to be reported and paid to the state treasurer in
accordance with laws pertaining to the disposition of
unclaimed property.
4. Before conducting a sale under subsection 2 of this
section, the operator shall:
(1) At least forty-five days before any disposition of
property under this section, which shall run concurrently
with subsection 2 of this section, notify the occupant and
each lienholder which is contained in any statement filed by
the occupant pursuant to subsection 3 of section 415.410 of
the default by first-class mail or electronic mail at the
occupant's or lienholder's last known address, and shall
notify any third-party owner identified by the occupant
pursuant to subsection 3 of section 415.410;
(2) No sooner than ten days after mailing the notice
required in subdivision (1) of this subsection, mail a
second notice of default, by verified mail or electronic
mail, to the occupant at the occupant's or lienholder's last
known address, which notice shall include:
(a) A statement that the contents of the occupant's
leased space are subject to the operator's lien;
(b) A statement of the operator's claim, indicating
the charges due on the date of the notice, the amount of any
additional charges which shall become due before the date of
release for sale and the date those additional charges shall
become due;

SB 1022 7
(c) A demand for payment of the charges due within a
specified time, not less than ten days after the date on
which the second notice was mailed;
(d) A statement that unless the claim is paid within
the time stated, the contents of the occupant's space will
be sold after a specified time; and
(e) The name, street address and telephone number of
the operator, or a designated agent whom the occupant may
contact, to respond to the notice[;
(3) At least seven days before the sale, advertise the
time, place and terms of the sale in a newspaper of general
circulation in the jurisdiction where the sale is to be
held. Such advertisement shall be in the classified section
of the newspaper and shall state that the items will be
released for sale].
5. If the property is a vehicle, watercraft, or
trailer [and rent] and [other charges remain unpaid] the
occupant is in default for sixty days, the [owner] operator
may treat the vehicle, watercraft, or trailer as an
abandoned vehicle and have the vehicle, watercraft, or
trailer towed from the self-service storage facility. When
the vehicle, watercraft, or trailer is towed from the self-
service storage facility, the [owner] operator shall not be
liable for the vehicle, watercraft, or trailer for any
damages to the motor vehicle, watercraft, or trailer once
the tower takes possession of the property.
6. At any time before a sale under this section, the
occupant may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien
and redeem the occupant's personal property.
415.420. 1. A purchaser in good faith of any personal
property sold under sections 415.400 to 415.425 takes the

SB 1022 8
property free and clear of any rights of any persons against
whom the lien was valid and other lienholders.
2. If the operator complies with the provisions of
sections 415.400 to 415.425, the operator's liability to the
occupant shall be limited to the net proceeds received from
the sale of the personal property, and to other lienholders
shall be limited to the net proceeds received from the sale
of any personal property covered by the other lien.
3. If an occupant is in default, the operator may deny
the occupant access to the leased space.
4. Unless otherwise specifically provided in sections
415.400 to 415.425, all notices required by sections 415.400
to 415.425 shall be sent by verified mail or electronic mail
to the last known address as defined in section 415.400.
Notices sent to the operator shall be sent to the self-
service storage facility where the occupant's property is
stored unless another address to send notices to the
operator is specified in the rental agreement. Notices to
the occupant shall be sent to the occupant at the occupant's
last known address. Notices shall be deemed delivered when
deposited with the United States postal service, properly
addressed as provided in subsection 4 of section 415.415,
with postage prepaid or sent via electronic mail to the last
known address.
✓